Alaska statutes. Title 11. Criminal Law.
Article 5. Prohibition on Prosecution.

Sec. 11.81.500.
No prosecution for safe surrender of infant.

A parent may not be criminally prosecuted for surrendering a child of the parent if the child

is an infant who is less than 21 days of age;

is surrendered in the manner described in AS

47.10.013(c)

; and

is not the subject of a court order affecting custody of the child.

History.

(§ 2 ch 1 SLA 2008)